Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 1
VOLUNTARY DISSOLUTION

7-114-101. Authorization of dissolution before issuance of shares.

If a corporation has not yet issued shares, a majority of its directors or, if no directors have been elected, a majority of its incorporators may authorize the dissolution of the corporation.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 822, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

7-114-102. Authorization of dissolution after issuance of shares.

After shares have been issued, dissolution of a corporation may be authorized in the manner provided in subsection (2) of this section.

For a proposal to dissolve the corporation to be authorized:

The board of directors shall adopt the proposal to dissolve;

The board of directors shall recommend the proposal to dissolve to the shareholders unless the board of directors determines that, because of conflict of interest or other special circumstances, it should make no recommendation and communicates the basis for its determination to the shareholders; and

The shareholders entitled to vote on the proposal to dissolve shall approve the proposal to dissolve as provided in subsection (5) of this section.

The board of directors may condition the effectiveness of the dissolution on any basis.

The corporation shall give notice, in accordance with section 7-107-105, to each shareholder entitled to vote on the proposal of the shareholders' meeting at which the proposal to dissolve will be voted upon. The notice shall state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the proposal to dissolve the corporation, and the notice shall contain or be accompanied by a copy of the proposal or a summary thereof.

Unless articles 101 to 117 of this title (including the provisions of section 7-117-101 (10)), the articles of incorporation, bylaws adopted by the shareholders, or the board of directors acting pursuant to subsection (3) of this section require a greater vote, the proposal to dissolve shall be approved by each voting group entitled to vote separately on the proposal by a majority of all the votes entitled to be cast on the proposal by that voting group.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 822, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

7-114-102.5. Dissolution upon expiration of period of duration.

A corporation shall be dissolved upon and by reason of the expiration of its period of duration, if any, stated in its articles of incorporation.

A provision in the articles of incorporation to the effect that the corporation or its existence shall be terminated at a stated date or after a stated period of time or upon a contingency, or any similar provision, shall be deemed to be a provision for a period of duration within the meaning of this section, and the occurrence of such date, the expiration of the stated period of time, the occurrence of such contingency, or the satisfaction of such provision shall be deemed to be the expiration of the corporation's period of duration for purposes of this section.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 1324, § 34, effective June 1.

L. 2003:

(2) amended, p. 2327, § 263, effective July 1, 2004.

7-114-103. Articles of dissolution.

At any time after dissolution is authorized, the corporation may dissolve by delivering to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title, articles of dissolution stating:

The domestic entity name of the corporation;

The principal office address of the corporation's principal office; and

That the corporation is dissolved.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 1506, § 280, effective July 1, 2004.)

A corporation is dissolved upon the effective date of its articles of dissolution.

Repealed.

Articles of dissolution need not be filed by a corporation that is dissolved pursuant to section 7-114-102.5.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 823, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 96:

(3) repealed and (4) added, pp. 1324, 1325, §§ 35, 36, effective June 1.

L. 2002:

IP(1) amended, p. 1850, § 121, effective July 1; IP(1) amended, p. 1715, § 121, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

IP(1), (1)(a), and (1)(b) amended, p. 2328, § 264, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1)(c), (1)(d), (1)(e), and (1)(f) amended, p. 1506, § 280, effective July 1.

7-114-103.5. Name of dissolved corporation - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 1324, § 34, effective June 1.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 979, § 63, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(2) added by revision, pp. 2356, 2357, §§ 347, 348.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2004. (See L. 2003, pp. 2356, 2357.)

7-114-104. Revocation of dissolution. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 823, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2000:

(3)(a) and (5) amended, p. 979, § 64, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

IP(3) and (4) amended, p. 1850, § 122, effective July 1; IP(3) and (4) amended, p. 1715, § 122, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

IP(3), (3)(a), (4), and (5) amended, p. 2328, § 265, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

Entire section repealed, p. 1507, § 281, effective July 1.

7-114-105. Effect of dissolution.

A dissolved corporation continues its corporate existence but may not carry on any business except as is appropriate to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs, including:

Collecting its assets;

Disposing of its properties that will not be distributed in kind to its shareholders;

Discharging or making provision for discharging its liabilities;

Distributing its remaining property among its shareholders according to their interests; and

Doing every other act necessary to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs.

Dissolution of a corporation does not:

Transfer title to the corporation's property;

Prevent transfer of its shares or securities, although the authorization to dissolve may provide for closing the corporation's share transfer records;

Subject its directors or officers to standards of conduct different from those prescribed in article 108 of this title;

Change quorum or voting requirements for its board of directors or shareholders; change provisions for selection, resignation, or removal of its directors or officers or both; or change provisions for amending its bylaws or its articles of incorporation;

Prevent commencement of a proceeding by or against the corporation in its name; or

Abate or suspend a proceeding pending by or against the corporation on the effective date of dissolution.

A dissolved corporation may dispose of claims against it pursuant to sections 7-90-911 and 7-90-912.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 824, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2004:

(2)(e) amended, p. 1508, § 282, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(3) added, p. 881, § 75, effective July 1.

7-114-106. Disposition of known claims by notification. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 825, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 96:

(2) amended, p. 1325, § 37, effective June 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section repealed, p. 884, § 87, effective July 1.

7-114-107. Disposition of claims by publication. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 826, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2003:

(2)(a) amended, p. 2328, § 266, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2006:

Entire section repealed, p. 884, § 87, effective July 1.

7-114-108. Enforcement of claims against dissolved corporation. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 827, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2006:

Entire section repealed, p. 884, § 87, effective July 1.

7-114-109. Service on dissolved corporation - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 827, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 96:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1325, § 38, effective June 1.

L. 2003:

(4) added by revision, pp. 2356, 2357, §§ 347, 348.

Editor's note:

Subsection (4) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2004. (See L. 2003, pp. 2356, 2357.)